Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,116
Violation of Central Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Compact; Attorney General; duties.

Any action for a violation of the Central Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Compact or an action to enjoin a violation or to compel performance under the compact shall be brought by the Attorney General in the name of the state.

Laws 1986, LB 491, § 39.

Central Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Compact, see section 71-3522.